Massachusetts, session 194th, S1292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4J of chapter 7 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
paragraph:-
Every agency and institution of the commonwealth shall transmit to the human resources
division all employment opportunities, notices and postings, excluding positions subject to
section 46D of chapter 30, chapter 31 and chapter 150E, including, but not limited to, notices of
job opportunities, new positions and vacancies. The division shall immediately place all such
information in the statewide employment computerized referral system. No position shall be
filled without full compliance with this paragraph.
of 1